Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Meetings and Action of the Board

§ 17-19-820.
Regular and special meetings.

If the time and place of a directors’ meeting is fixed by the bylaws or the board, the meeting is a regular meeting. All other meetings are special meetings.

A board of directors may hold regular or special meetings in or out of this state.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, a board may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously communicate with each other during the meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means is deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-821.
Action without meeting.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, action required or permitted by this act to be taken at a board of directors’ meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by all members of the board. The action shall be evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by each director, and included in the minutes filed with the corporate records reflecting the action taken.

Action taken under this section is effective when the last director signs the consent, unless the consent specifies a different effective date.

A consent signed under this section has the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-822.
Call and notice of meetings.

Unless the articles, bylaws or subsection (c) of this section provide otherwise, regular meetings of the board may be held without notice.

Unless the articles, bylaws or subsection (c) of this section provide otherwise, special meetings of the board shall be preceded by at least two (2) days notice to each director of the date, time, and place, but not the purpose, of the meeting.

In corporations without members any board action to remove a director or to approve a matter that would require approval by the members if the corporation had members, shall not be valid unless each director is given at least seven (7) days written notice that the matter will be voted upon at a directors’ meeting or unless notice is waived pursuant to W.S.

17-19-823

.

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, the presiding officer of the board, the president or twenty percent (20%) of the directors then in office may call and give notice of a meeting of the board.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-823.
Waiver of notice.

A director may at any time waive any notice required by this act, the articles or bylaws. Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the waiver shall be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, and filed with the minutes or the corporate records.

A director’s attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice of the meeting unless the director upon arriving at the meeting or prior to the vote on a matter not noticed in conformity with this act the articles or bylaws objects to lack of notice and does not thereafter vote for or assent to the objected to action.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a) and in subsection (b), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-824.
Quorum and voting.

Except as otherwise provided in this act, the articles or bylaws, a quorum of a board of directors consists of a majority of the directors in office immediately before a meeting begins. In no event may the articles or bylaws authorize a quorum of fewer than the greater of one-third (1/3) of the number of directors in office or two (2) directors.

If a quorum is present when a vote is taken, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is the act of the board unless this act, the articles or bylaws require the vote of a greater number of directors.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a) and in subsection (b), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-825.
Committees of the board; other informal committees.

Unless prohibited or limited by the articles or bylaws, a board of directors may create one (1) or more committees of the board and shall only appoint members of the board to serve on them. Each committee shall have two (2) or more directors, who serve at the pleasure of the board.

The creation of a committee and appointment of members to it shall be approved by the greater of:

A majority of all the directors in office when the action is taken; or

The number of directors required by the articles or bylaws to take action under W.S.

17-19-824

.

W.S.

17-19-820

through

17-19-824

, which govern meetings, action without meetings, notice and waiver of notice, and quorum and voting requirements of the board, apply to committees of the board and their members as well.

To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the articles or bylaws, each committee of the board may exercise the board’s authority under W.S.

17-19-801

.

A committee of the board shall not, however:

Authorize distributions;

Approve or recommend to members dissolution, merger, consolidation or the sale, pledge or transfer of all or substantially all of the corporation’s assets;

Elect, appoint or remove directors or fill vacancies on the board or on any of its committees; or

Adopt, amend or repeal the articles or bylaws.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in W.S.

17-19-830

.

Nothing in this section prohibits a board from appointing informal or advisory committees comprised of persons who may or may not be members of the board to undertake tasks assigned to them by the board.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.